Connecticut, session 2026, HB05307.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 19a-601 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) Prior to the performance of an abortion upon a minor, a physician
or counselor shall provide pregnancy information and counseling in
accordance with this section in a manner and language that will be
understood by the minor. The physician or counselor shall:
(1) Explain that the information being given to the minor is being
given objectively and is not intended to coerce, persuade or induce the
minor to choose to have an abortion or to carry the pregnancy to term;
(2) Explain that the minor may withdraw a decision to have an
abortion at any time before the abortion is performed or may reconsider
a decision not to have an abortion at any time within the time period
during which an abortion may legally be performed;
LCO No. 1709 1 of 5

Raised Bill No. 5307
(3) Explain to the minor the alternative choices available for
managing the pregnancy, including: (A) Carrying the pregnancy to term
and keeping the child, (B) carrying the pregnancy to term and placing
the child for adoption, placing the child with a relative or obtaining
voluntary foster care for the child, and (C) having an abortion, and
explain that public and private agencies are available to assist the minor
with whichever alternative she chooses and that a list of these agencies
and the services available from each will be provided if the minor
requests;
(4) Explain that public and private agencies are available to provide
birth control information and that a list of these agencies and the
services available from each will be provided if the minor requests; and
[(5) Discuss the possibility of involving the minor's parents, guardian
or other adult family members in the minor's decision-making
concerning the pregnancy and whether the minor believes that
involvement would be in the minor's best interests; and]
[(6)] (5) Provide adequate opportunity for the minor to ask any
questions concerning the pregnancy, abortion, child care and adoption,
and provide information the minor seeks or, if the person cannot
provide the information, indicate where the minor can receive the
information.
(b) After the person provides the information and counseling to a
minor as required by this section, such person shall have the minor sign
and date a form stating that:
(1) The minor has received information on alternatives to abortion
and that there are agencies that will provide assistance and that a list of
these agencies and the services available from each will be provided if
the minor requests;
(2) The minor has received an explanation that the minor may
withdraw an abortion decision or reconsider a decision to carry a
LCO No. 1709 2 of 5

Raised Bill No. 5307
pregnancy to term;
(3) The alternatives available for managing the pregnancy have been
explained to the minor;
(4) The minor has received an explanation about agencies available
to provide birth control information and that a list of these agencies and
the services available from each will be provided if the minor requests;
(5) The minor has [discussed with the person providing the
information and counseling the possibility of involving the minor's
parents, guardian or other adult family members in the minor's
decision-making about the pregnancy] received an explanation of the
notification requirements set forth in section 2 of this act;
(6) If applicable, the minor has determined that not involving the
minor's parents, guardian or other adult family members is in the
minor's best interests; and
(7) The minor has been given an adequate opportunity to ask
questions.
(c) The person providing the information and counseling shall also
sign and date the form and shall include such person's business address
and business telephone number. The person shall keep a copy for such
minor's medical record and shall give the form to the minor or, if the
minor requests and if such person is not the attending physician,
transmit the form to the minor's attending physician. Such medical
record shall be maintained as otherwise provided by law.
(d) The provision of pregnancy information and counseling by a
physician or counselor which is evidenced in writing containing the
information and statements provided in this section and which is signed
by the minor shall be presumed to be evidence of compliance with the
requirements of this section.
(e) The requirements of this section shall not apply when, in the best
LCO No. 1709 3 of 5

Raised Bill No. 5307
medical judgment of the physician based on the facts of the case before
him, a medical emergency exists that so complicates the pregnancy or
the health, safety or well-being of the minor as to require an immediate
abortion. A physician who does not comply with the requirements of
this section by reason of this exception shall state in the medical record
of the abortion the medical indications on which his judgment was
based.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) In addition to the provision
of information and counseling required under section 19a-601 of the
general statutes, as amended by this act, after performing an abortion,
the health care provider authorized to perform such abortion under
section 19a-602 of the general statutes, or a counselor as defined in
section 19a-600 of the general statutes, shall explain and carry out the
following notification procedures to parents, guardians or other
individuals:
(1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, notice
shall be provided to at least one parent or guardian of a pregnant
unemancipated minor not less than forty-eight hours after the
performance of an abortion upon such minor;
(2) If a pregnant unemancipated minor declares in a signed written
statement that such minor is a victim of sexual abuse, neglect or physical
abuse by either a parent or guardian, the notice required pursuant to
subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be provided to such minor's
sibling who is aged twenty-one years or older or a stepparent or
grandparent specified by such minor or, if no such person exists, to
some other person who is aged twenty-one years or older specified by
such minor; and
100 (3) If the health care provider authorized to perform the abortion
101 pursuant to section 19a-602 of the general statutes, or a counselor, as
102 defined in section 19a-600 of the general statutes, receives a signed
103 statement pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection, such provider
LCO No. 1709 4 of 5

Raised Bill No. 5307
104 or counselor shall certify in the minor's medical record that such
105 individual or counselor has received such statement. Such provider or
106 counselor, who relies in good faith on such statement, shall not be civilly
107 or criminally liable for failure to give the notice required pursuant to
108 subdivision (1) of this subsection.
109 (b) Any parent or guardian of a minor child who does not receive
110 notice of the performance of an abortion in accordance with the
111 provisions of this section shall not be liable for the costs of pregnancy-
112 related health care services, examination or treatment provided to the
113 minor child.
114 Sec. 3. Section 19a-919 of the general statutes is repealed. (Effective
115 October 1, 2026)
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 19a-601
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 Repealer section